Washington statutes.
RCW 28A.405.110

Evaluations—Legislative findings.

The legislature recognizes the importance of teachers in the educational system. Teachers are the fundamental element in assuring a quality education for the state's and the nation's children. Teachers, through their direct contact with children, have a great impact on the development of the child. The legislature finds that this important role of the teacher requires an assurance that teachers are as successful as possible in attaining the goal of a well-educated society. The legislature finds, therefore, that the evaluation of those persons seeking to enter the teaching profession is no less important than the evaluation of those persons currently teaching. The evaluation of persons seeking teaching credentials should be strenuous while making accommodations uniquely appropriate to the applicants. Strenuous teacher training and preparation should be complemented by examinations of prospective teachers prior to candidates being granted official certification by the professional educator standards board. Teacher preparation program entrance evaluations, teacher training, teacher preparation program exit examinations, official certification, in-service training, and ongoing evaluations of individual progress and professional growth are all part of developing and maintaining a strong precertification and postcertification professional education system.

The legislature further finds that an evaluation system for teachers has the following elements, goals, and objectives: (1) An evaluation system must be meaningful, helpful, and objective; (2) an evaluation system must encourage improvements in teaching skills, techniques, and abilities by identifying areas needing improvement; (3) an evaluation system must provide a mechanism to make meaningful distinctions among teachers and to acknowledge, recognize, and encourage superior teaching performance; and (4) an evaluation system must encourage respect in the evaluation process by the persons conducting the evaluations and the persons subject to the evaluations through recognizing the importance of objective standards and minimizing subjectivity.

[ 2006 c 263 s 806; 1985 c 420 s 1. Formerly RCW 28A.67.205.]

NOTES:

Findings—Purpose—Part headings not law—2006 c 263: See notes following RCW 28A.150.230.

Contingency—Effective date—1985 c 420: "If specific funding for the purposes of this act, referencing this act by bill number, is not provided by the legislature by July 1, 1987, sections 1 through 5 and 7 through 10 of this act shall be null and void. This act shall be of no effect unless such specific funding is so provided. If such funding is so provided, this act shall take effect when the legislation providing the funding takes effect." [ 1985 c 420 s 11.]

Reviser's note: (1) 1985 ex.s. c 6 s 501 provides specific funding for the purposes of this act.

(2) 1985 ex.s. c 6 took effect June 27, 1985.

Severability—1985 c 420: "If any provision of this act or its application to any person or circumstance is held invalid, the remainder of the act or the application of the provision to other persons or circumstances is not affected." [ 1985 c 420 s 12.]